Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201344-6007.02
Health organization, defined.

Health organization means a health maintenance organization, prepaid
limited health service organization, prepaid dental service corporation, or
other managed care organization. Health organization does not include a life
and health insurer, a fraternal
benefit society, or a property and casualty insurer as defined
in section 44-6008 that is otherwise subject to either life and health or
property and casualty risk-based capital requirements.

Laws 1999, LB 258, § 12;

Laws 2013, LB426, § 2.